ro-RO: Soiul de tamarind: Tamarind african; Tamarind negru; Tamarind verde; Makham Wan; Tamarind de Manila; Tamarind fără sâmburi; Tamarind acru; Tamarind dulce; Tamarind catifelat; Altele
zh-CN: 罗望子品种: 非洲罗望子; 黑罗望子; 绿罗望子; Makham Wan; 马尼拉罗望子; 无籽罗望子; 酸罗望子; 甜罗望子; 天鹅绒罗望子; 其他
de: Tamarindenart: Afrikanische Tamarinde; Schwarze Tamarinde; Grüne Tamarinde; Makham Wan; Manila-Tamarinde; Kernlose Tamarinde; Saure Tamarinde; Süße Tamarinde; Samttamarinde; Sonstige
en: Tamarind variety: African tamarind; Black tamarind; Green tamarind; Makham Wan; Manila tamarind; Seedless tamarind; Sour tamarind; Sweet tamarind; Velvet tamarind; Other
fr: Variété de tamarin: Tamarinier d’Afrique; Tamarin noir; Tamarin vert; Makham Wan; Tamarin de Manille; Tamarin sans pépins; Tamarin acide; Tamarin doux; Tamarin velours; Autre
nb: Tamarind-variant: Afrikansk tamarind; Svart tamarind; Grønn tamarind; Makham Wan; Manilatamarind; Steinfri tamarind; Sur tamarind; Søt tamarind; Fløyelstamarind; Annet
es: Variedad de tamarindo: Tamarindo africano; Tamarindo negro; Tamarindo verde; Makham Wan; Tamarindo de Manila; Tamarindo sin semillas; Tamarindo agrio; Tamarindo dulce; Tamarindo aterciopelado; Otra
it: Varietà di tamarindo: Tamarindo africano; Tamarindo nero; Tamarindo verde; Makham Wan; Tamarindo di Manila; Tamarindo senza semi; Tamarindo aspro; Tamarindo dolce; Tamarindo vellutato; Altro
ko: 타마린드 품종: 아프리카 타마린드; 블랙 타마린드; 그린 타마린드; 마캄 완; 마닐라 타마린드; 씨 없는 타마린드; 사워 타마린드; 스위트 타마린드; 벨벳 타마린드; 기타
sk-SK: Odroda tamarindu: Africký tamarind; Čierny tamarind; Zelený tamarind; Makham Wan; Manilský tamarind; Tamarind bez kôstok; Kyslý tamarind; Sladký tamarind; Zamatový tamarind; Iné
fi: Tamarindilajike: Afrikkalainen tamarindi; Musta tamarindi; Vihreä tamarindi; Makham Wan; Manilantamarindi; Siemenetön tamarindi; Hapan tamarindi; Makea tamarindi; Samettitamarindi; Muu
th: มะขามพันธุ์ต่างๆ: มะขามแอฟริกา; มะขามดำ; มะขามเขียว; มะขามหวาน (Makham Wan); มะขามเทศ; มะขามไร้เมล็ด; มะขามเปรี้ยว; มะขามหวาน; ลูกหยี; อื่นๆ
sv: Tamarindsort: Afrikansk tamarind; Svart tamarind; Grön tamarind; Makham Wan; Manilatamarind; Kärnfri tamarind; Sur tamarind; Söt tamarind; Sammetstamarind; Annat
ja: タマリンドの種類: アフリカタマリンド; ブラックタマリンド; グリーンタマリンド; マカムワン; マニラタマリンド; 種なしタマリンド; サワータマリンド; スウィートタマリンド; ベルベットタマリンド; その他
cs: Odrůda tamarindu: Africký tamarind; Černý tamarind; Zelený tamarind; Makham Wan; Manilský tamarind; Tamarind bez pecek; Kyselý tamarind; Sladký tamarind; Sametový tamarind; Jiné
pl: Odmiana tamaryndowca: Tamaryndowiec afrykański; Tamaryndowiec czarny; Tamaryndowiec zielony; Makham Wan; Tamaryndowiec manilski; Tamaryndowiec bezpestkowy; Tamaryndowiec kwaśny; Tamaryndowiec słodki; Tamaryndowiec aksamitny; Inne
vi: Giống me: Me châu Phi; Me đen; Me xanh; Makham Wan; Me nước; Me không hạt; Me chua; Me ngọt; Me rừng; Khác
el: Ποικιλία ταμάρινδου: Αφρικανικό ταμάρινδο; Μαύρο ταμάρινδο; Πράσινο ταμάρινδο; Makham Wan; Ταμάρινδο Μανίλας; Ταμάρινδο χωρίς κουκούτσια; Ξινό ταμάρινδο; Γλυκό ταμάρινδο; Βελούδινο ταμάρινδο; Άλλο
sl-SI: Sorta tamarinda: Afriška tamarinda; Črna tamarinda; Zelena tamarinda; Makham Wan; Manilska tamarinda; Tamarinda brez semen; Kisla tamarinda; Sladka tamarinda; Žametna tamarinda; Drugo
hu: Tamarind fajtái: Afrikai tamarindusz; Fekete tamarindusz; Zöld tamarindusz; Makham Wan; Manilai tamarindusz; Mag nélküli tamarindusz; Savanyú tamarindusz; Édes tamarindusz; Bársonyos tamarindusz; Egyéb
pt-PT: Variedade de tamarindo: Tamarindo africano; Tamarindo preto; Tamarindo verde; Makham Wan; Tamarindo de Manila; Tamarindo sem sementes; Tamarindo azedo; Tamarindo doce; Tamarindo veludo; Outro
bg-BG: Сорт тамаринд: Африкански тамаринд; Черен тамаринд; Зелен тамаринд; Макам уан; Манилски тамаринд; Тамаринд без семки; Кисел тамаринд; Сладък тамаринд; Кадифен тамаринд; Друго
hr-HR: Sorta tamarinda: Afrički tamarind; Crni tamarind; Zeleni tamarind; Makham Wan; Manilski tamarind; Tamarind bez sjemenki; Kiseli tamarind; Slatki tamarind; Baršunasti tamarind; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tamarindo variedade: Tamarindo africano; Tamarindo preto; Tamarindo verde; Makham Wan; Tamarindo de Manila; Tamarindo sem semente; Tamarindo azedo; Tamarindo doce; Tamarindo veludo; Outro
tr: Demirhindi çeşidi: Afrika demirhindisi; Siyah demirhindi; Yeşil demirhindi; Makham Wan; Manila demirhindisi; Çekirdeksiz demirhindi; Ekşi demirhindi; Tatlı demirhindi; Kadife demirhindi; Diğer
nl: Tamarinde variëteit: Afrikaanse tamarinde; Zwarte tamarinde; Groene tamarinde; Makham Wan; Manilla-tamarinde; Pitloze tamarinde; Zure tamarinde; Zoete tamarinde; Fluweeltamarinde; Overig
lt-LT: Tamarindo veislė: Afrikinis tamarindas; Juodasis tamarindas; Žaliasis tamarindas; Makham Wan; Manilinis tamarindas; Tamarindas be sėklų; Rūgštusis tamarindas; Saldusis tamarindas; Aksominis tamarindas; Kita
ru: Разновидность тамаринда: Африканский тамаринд; Чёрный тамаринд; Зелёный тамаринд; Макам Ван; Манильский тамаринд; Тамаринд без косточек; Кислый тамаринд; Сладкий тамаринд; Бархатный тамаринд; Другое
zh-TW: 羅望子品種: 非洲羅望子; 黑羅望子; 綠羅望子; Makham Wan; 馬尼拉羅望子; 無籽羅望子; 酸羅望子; 甜羅望子; 絲絨羅望子; 其他
da: Tamarindvariant: Afrikansk tamarind; Sort tamarind; Grøn tamarind; Makham Wan; Manila-tamarind; Stenfri tamarind; Sur tamarind; Sød tamarind; Fløjl-tamarind; Andet